Georgia, session 2025_26, HB26.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "School Behavioral Mental Health Support
Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 2 of Chapter 1 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
powers and duties of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities
H. B. 26
- 1 -

LC 60 0037
regarding the governing and regulation of mental health, is amended by adding a new Code
section to read as follows:
"37-1-30.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'mental health or substance use disorder' means
a mental illness or addictive disease.
(b) Subject to available appropriations or other funding, the department shall establish a
school-linked behavioral health grant program to provide early identification of and
intervention for students with mental health or substance use disorder needs and to build
the capacity of K-12 schools to support students with mental health or substance use
disorder needs in the classroom.
(c) An eligible applicant for a school-linked behavioral health grant is an entity or provider
that is:
(1) A community service board;
(2) A community mental health center;
(3) A licensed healthcare provider who primarily provides treatment or diagnosis of
mental health or substance use disorders; and
(4) A Medicaid provider that employs licensed healthcare providers who provide
treatment or diagnosis of mental health or substance use disorders to children and
families.
(d) Allowable grant activities and related expenses may include but shall not be limited
to:
(1) Identifying and diagnosing mental health or substance use disorders of students;
(2) Delivering mental health or substance use disorder treatment and services to students
and their families, including via telehealth;
(3) Supporting families in meeting their children's needs, including navigating
healthcare, social services, and the juvenile justice system;
H. B. 26
- 2 -

LC 60 0037
(4) Providing transportation for students receiving school-linked behavioral health
services when school is not in session;
(5) Building the capacity of schools to meet the needs of students with mental health or
substance use disorder concerns, including school staff development activities for
licensed and nonlicensed staff; and
(6) Equipment purchases, connection charges, on-site coordination, set-up fees, and site
fees associated with delivering school-linked behavioral health services via telehealth.
(e) Grantees shall obtain all available third-party reimbursement sources as a condition of
receiving a school-linked behavioral health grant. For purposes of this grant program, a
third-party reimbursement source excludes a local school system. Grantees shall serve
students regardless of health coverage status or ability to pay.
(f) Grantees shall collect and provide data to the department for the purpose of evaluating
the effectiveness of the school-linked behavioral health grant program."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 26
- 3 -